Ohio, session 136, HB654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2927.01 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2927.01. (A) No person, except as authorized by law, shall treat a human corpse in a way that the person knows would outrage reasonable family sensibilities. (B) No person, except as authorized by law, shall treat a human corpse in a way that would outrage reasonable community sensibilities. (C) (C)(1) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of abuse of a corpse, a misdemeanor of the second degreefelony of the fifth degree. Whoever Except as provided in divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section, whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of gross abuse of a corpse, a felony of the fifth fourth degree. (2) Except as provided in division (C)(3) of this section, if the offender dismembers, mutilates, or intentionally disfigures a human corpse, a violation of division (B) of this section is a felony of the third degree. (3) If the offender dismembers, mutilates, or intentionally disfigures a human corpse for the purpose of concealing a crime, obstructing justice, or impairing the investigation or prosecution of a criminal offense, a violation of division (B) of this section is a felony of the second degree. Section 2. That existing section 2927.01 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as Amanda Dean's Law.